Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3556
Hospital districts; bonds; issuance; petition.

A vote shall be ordered upon the issuance of such bonds either (1) upon resolution of a majority of the members of the board of directors, or (2) whenever a petition shall be presented to the board requesting that a vote be taken for or against the issuing of bonds in such amount as may be specified for any one or more of the purposes authorized by section 23-3554. Such petition shall be signed by at least ten percent of the qualified voters of such district.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 3, p. 352;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.51.